apertium-id-ms.ms.dix
    <pardef n="kalian__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kamu__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mereka__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dia__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ku__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="seseorang__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="yang__rel">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="rel"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="baca__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengalir__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengalirkan__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengalirkannya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengalirnya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mempersalin__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mempersalini__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-i"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mempersalinnya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-i"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mempersalinkan__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mempersalinkannya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mempersalinnya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengaliri__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="si"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengalirinya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="si"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="berbicara__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ber"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="berhubungan__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ber-an"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="berhubungannya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ber-an"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="berkewajiban__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ber"/><s n="ke-an"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="berpenampilan__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ber"/><s n="peN-an"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bacanya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dibaca__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dialirkan__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dialirkannya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dibacanya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diperbuat__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diperhiasi__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-i"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diperhiasinya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-i"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diperebutkan__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diperebutkannya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diperbuatnya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dialiri__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="si"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dialirinya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="si"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="baca-baca__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="red"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="baca-bacanya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="red"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keberadaan-keberadaan__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ber"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keberadaan-keberadaannya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ber"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keberadaan__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ber"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keberadaannya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ber"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kepejuangan-kepejuangan__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="pe"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kepejuangan-kepejuangannya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="pe"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kepejuangan__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="pe"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="undang"><p><l>undang-undang</l><r>undang</r></p><par n="baca-baca__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kambuh"><i>kambuh</i><par n="baca__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="menghadapinya"><i>menghadapinya</i><par n="baca__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="seman"><i>seman</i><par n="baca__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ada"><p><l>adanya</l><r>ada</r></p><par n="bacanya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tampak"><p><l>tampaknya</l><r>tampak</r></p><par n="bacanya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ganding"><p><l>berganding</l><r>ganding</r></p><par n="berbicara__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kahwin"><p><l>berkahwin</l><r>kahwin</r></p><par n="berbicara__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="siap"><p><l>bersiap</l><r>siap</r></p><par n="berbicara__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="jatuh"><p><l>berjatuhan</l><r>jatuh</r></p><par n="berhubungan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="langgan"><p><l>berlangganan</l><r>langgan</r></p><par n="berhubungan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="putus"><p><l>berkeputusan</l><r>putus</r></p><par n="berkewajiban__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sinambung"><p><l>berkesinambungan</l><r>sinambung</r></p><par n="berkewajiban__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="beliau"><i>beliau</i><par n="dia__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="dia"><i>dia</i><par n="dia__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ia"><i>ia</i><par n="dia__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="kenal"><p><l>dikenali</l><r>kenal</r></p><par n="dialiri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kejar"><p><l>dikejar</l><r>kejar</r></p><par n="dibaca__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="panggang"><p><l>dipanggang</l><r>panggang</r></p><par n="dibaca__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kalian"><i>kalian</i><par n="kalian__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="awak"><i>awak</i><par n="kamu__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="dikau"><i>dikau</i><par n="kamu__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="kamu"><i>kamu</i><par n="kamu__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ada"><p><l>keberadaan</l><r>ada</r></p><par n="keberadaan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="aku"><p><l>ku</l><r>aku</r></p><par n="ku__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ingat"><p><l>memperingati</l><r>ingat</r></p><par n="mempersalini__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kembang"><p><l>memperkembangkan</l><r>kembang</r></p><par n="mempersalinkan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kenal"><p><l>memperkenalkan</l><r>kenal</r></p><par n="mempersalinkan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rebut"><p><l>memperebutkan</l><r>rebut</r></p><par n="mempersalinkan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gali"><p><l>menggali</l><r>gali</r></p><par n="mengalir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="limpah"><p><l>melimpah</l><r>limpah</r></p><par n="mengalir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="serang"><p><l>menyerang</l><r>serang</r></p><par n="mengalir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gelut"><p><l>menggeluti</l><r>gelut</r></p><par n="mengaliri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ingat"><p><l>mengingati</l><r>ingat</r></p><par n="mengaliri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="naik"><p><l>menaiki</l><r>naik</r></p><par n="mengaliri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kena"><p><l>mengenainya</l><r>kena</r></p><par n="mengalirinya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lalu"><p><l>melaluinya</l><r>lalu</r></p><par n="mengalirinya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tahu"><p><l>mengetahuinya</l><r>tahu</r></p><par n="mengalirinya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hadir"><p><l>menghadirkan</l><r>hadir</r></p><par n="mengalirkan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lucut"><p><l>melucutkan</l><r>lucut</r></p><par n="mengalirkan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="terus"><p><l>meneruskan</l><r>terus</r></p><par n="mengalirkan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="jadi"><p><l>menjadikannya</l><r>jadi</r></p><par n="mengalirkannya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="main"><p><l>memainkannya</l><r>main</r></p><par n="mengalirkannya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="serah"><p><l>menyerahkannya</l><r>serah</r></p><par n="mengalirkannya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="buang"><p><l>membuangnya</l><r>buang</r></p><par n="mengalirnya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hantar"><p><l>menghantarnya</l><r>hantar</r></p><par n="mengalirnya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tolak"><p><l>menolaknya</l><r>tolak</r></p><par n="mengalirnya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mereka"><i>mereka</i><par n="mereka__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="kedua-duanya"><i>kedua-duanya</i><par n="seseorang__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="mana saja"><i>mana<b/>saja</i><par n="seseorang__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="siapapun"><i>siapapun</i><par n="seseorang__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="yang"><i>yang</i><par n="yang__rel"/></e>
